en: extruded rice
bg: екструдиран ориз
ca: extrudit d'arròs
de: Reis extrudiert, extrudierter Reis
es: arroz extruido
fi: ekstrudoitu riisi
fr: riz extrudé
hr: ekstrudirana riža
hu: extrudált rizs
it: riso estruso
pl: ekstrudat ryżowy
pt: arroz extrudido
sr: pirinač ekstrudat

en: puffed rice, crisped rice, rice crisps
ca: arròs inflat, arròs inflats
da: puffat ris, puffede ris
de: Puffreis, Reis-Crispies, Reis gepufft, Crisp-Rice
es: arroz inflado, arroz inflados
et: riisikrõpsud
fi: riisimuro, riisimurot, puffattu riisi
fr: riz soufflé, riz croustillant
hr: rižin krispi
hu: puffasztott rizs
it: riso soffiato
nl: gepofte rijst, rijst pofte
pt: arroz tufado
sv: riskrisp, puffat ris

en: puffed rice and corn, rice and corn crisps
sv: ris- och majskrisp

fr: galette de riz
de: Reiswaffeln
it: gallette di riso
nl: rijstwafel, rijstwafels

en: rice extract
ca: extracte d'arròs
de: Reis-Extrakt, Reisextrakt
es: extracto de arroz
fi: riisiuute
fr: extrait de riz, extraits de riz
hr: ekstrakt riže
hu: rizskivonat
it: estratto di riso
nl: rijstextract
sv: risextrakt

en: fermented rice
it: riso fermentato
ru: рис ферментированный

en: cooked rice
da: kogt ris
de: Kochreis
es: Arroz cocido
fi: kypsennetty riisi, keitetty riisi
fr: riz cuisiné, riz cuit
hr: kuhana riža
hu: főtt rizs
it: Riso cotto
nl: gekookte rijst
pl: ryż gotowany, gotowany ryż
ro: orez fiert, orez gătit
sv: kokt ris

en: cooked white rice
ca: arròs blanc cuit, arròs blanc precuit
de: gegarter weißer Reis, weißer Reis gegart
es: arroz blanco cocido, arroz blanco precocido, arroz blanco precocinado
fi: kypsennetty valkoinen riisi
fr: riz blanc cuit
hr: kuhana bijela riža
hu: főtt fehér rizs
it: riso bianco cotto
nl: gekookte witte rijst

fr: crème de riz
nl: rijst crème

en: germinated rice, sprouted rice
fr: riz germé
hr: proklijala riža
it: riso germogliato
pl: kiełki ryżu

en: germinated brown rice, sprouted brown rice
es: arroz integral germinado
fr: riz complet germé, riz brun germé
hr: proklijala smeđa riža
it: riso integrale germogliato

en: germinated red rice, sprouted red rice
de: gekeimter roter Reis
fr: riz rouge germé
hr: proklijala crvena riža
it: riso rosso germogliato

en: Red yeast rice
de: Rot fermentierter Reis
es: Arroz de levadura roja
fr: Levure de riz rouge
hr: crvena riža s kvascem
id: Angkak
it: riso rosso fermentato
ja: 紅麹
jv: Angkak
ko: 홍국
pt: Arroz fermentado vermelho
ru: Красный дрожжевой рис
tr: Kırmızı pirinç mayası
zh: 紅麴米

en: germinated black rice, sprouted black rice
de: gekeimter schwarzer Reis
fr: riz noir germé
hr: proklijala crna riža
it: riso nero germogliato
nl: ontkiemde zwarte rijst

en: sushi rice
fr: riz pour sushi
hr: sushi riža
it: riso per sushi
pt: Arroz de sushi

en: rice milk
hr: rižino mlijeko
it: latte di riso
nl: rijstmelk

en: carob bean, locust bean, carob seeds, carob, Carobin
ca: garrofa, farina de garrofa
cs: carubin
da: Johannesbrødmel
de: Carobin, Carobpulver, Johannisbrot, Johannisbrote
es: Harina de algarroba, harina de garrofin
et: Jaanileivapuujahu
fi: carob
fr: caroube, farine de caroube
hr: rogač, rokać
hu: karob, karob liszt
it: carruba
lv: ceratonijas pupiņas
nl: carob, johannesbroodmeel, carobpoeder
pl: karob, karobu, karobowy, karobowe, karobowa
sl: rožič
sv: Johannesbrödfrö

en: caroube dalmate
hr: dalmatinski rogač
it: caroube dalmate

en: carob seed flour, carob kernel flour, carob flour
bg: брашно от рожков, рожково брашно
cs: Karobová mouka
da: Johannesbrødkernemel
de: Johannisbrotkernmehl, Johannisbrotkeimmehl, Stabilisator Johannisbrotkernmehl
es: Harina de semillas de algarroba, semillas de algarroba
fi: johanneksenleipäpuujauhe, Johanneksenleipäpuujauhetta
fr: farine de graines de caroube, farine de graine de caroube, farine de graines de caroubes, graines de caroube, graine de caroube
hr: brašno sjemenke rogača, brašno sjemenki rogača
hu: szentjánoskenyér-liszt, szentjánoskenyér liszt, Szentjánoskenyérliszt, szentjánoskenyér
it: farina di semi di carruba, farina di semi di carrube, semi di carrube
lt: Saldžiosios ceratonijos lipai
nl: johannesbroodpitmeel
pl: Mączka chleba świętojańskiego
pt: farinha de semente de alfarroba, Farinha de sementes de alfarroba, semente de alfarroba, sementes de alfarroba, goma de alfarroba
sv: fruktkärnmjöl

en: peruvian carob gum
de: Peruanisches Johannisbrotkernmehl
es: goma garrofín peruana
hr: peruanska guma od rogača